Utah statutes.
10-8-54.   Regulation of construction and condition of chimneys and heating
equipment -- Disposal of ashes.
They may prevent the dangerous construction and condition of chimneys,
fireplaces, stoves, stovepipes, heaters, ovens, furnaces, boilers, and
apparatus used in and about buildings and manufactories, and cause the same to
be removed or placed in a safe condition; and may regulate and prevent the
carrying on of manufacturing likely to cause fires, and may prevent the
deposit of ashes in unsafe places.
